Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.160

Contracts subject to requirements established under office of minority and women's business enterprises.

(1) All contracts entered into under this chapter by the state on or after September 1, 1983, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(2) All contracts entered into under this chapter by the state on or after January 1, 2024, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 49.60.530.

[ 2023 c 468 s 3; 1983 c 120 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Applicability—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1983 c 120: See RCW 39.19.910, 39.19.920.